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DTC C1552 / 52 DC Motor Power Source Voltage Mal-
function

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The VGRS ECU monitors PIG (motor power source voltage). If the ECU detects a malfunction, it turns on
the warning light, records the DTC and stops VGRS operation.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1552/52
The system checks that the IG voltage is 9 to 16 V, and the
PIG terminal voltage is less than 6 V for 2.4 sec.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check motor power source voltage (PIG).

PREPARATION:
Record and clear VGRS DTCs.
CHECK:
Start the engine and measure the voltage between terminals
PIG and PGND of the VGRS ECU.

A 9 to 16 V

B Below 9 V

C Above 16 V

B Check or repair harness and VGRS fuse.

C Check and repair charging system.

A

2 Check VGRS for DTC C1552/52.

Is DTC C1552/52 present?

YES Replace VGRS ECU.

NO

No fault detected.

NOTICE:
Fault may be intermittent. Check harness and connectors carefully and retest.


